District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

8-171.06

Citizens Energy Advisory Committee.

Expired.

History

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-132, § 7, 28 DCR 445
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 11, 30 DCR 3341
May 19, 1987, D.C. Law 7-4, § 2, 34 DCR 2334
Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-33, § 2, 34 DCR 5314
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 32, 35 DCR 147
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-45, § 2, 38 DCR 4988

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-906.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-906.
1981 Ed., § 1-1906.

Editor's Notes

Expiration of the Citizens Energy Advisory Committee: Pursuant to subsection (e) of expired § 1-1906 § 2-906, 2001 Ed., the Citizens Energy Advisory Committee “shall continue in existence for 14 years, at which time, it shall be terminated unless reestablished by the Council of the District of Columbia.” The citizens Energy Advisory Committee is deemed to have expired on March 4, 1995.